Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-117.07
Proceedings to suspend, cancel, or revoke licenses before commission.

All proceedings for the suspension, cancellation, or revocation of licenses of manufacturers, wholesalers, nonbeverage users, craft breweries, microdistilleries, railroads, airlines, shippers, boats, special party buses, and pedal-pub vehicles shall be before the commission, and the proceedings shall be in accordance with rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by it not inconsistent with law. No such license shall be so suspended, canceled, or revoked except after a hearing by the commission with reasonable notice to the licensee and opportunity to appear and defend.

Laws 1935, c. 116, § 94, p. 425;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 53-394;

R.S.1943, § 53-140;

Laws 1967, c. 332, § 11, p. 891;

Laws 1980, LB 848, § 8;

Laws 1988, LB 1089, § 19;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 53-140;

Laws 1991, LB 344, § 12;

Laws 1996, LB 750, § 2;

Laws 2007, LB549, § 4;

Laws 2015, LB330, § 10;

Laws 2020, LB734, § 4.